dictionaries/cs_CZ/cs_CZ.aff
SFX T Y 114
SFX T   t           n          [^aiouyíýcsz]t
SFX T   t           na         [^aiouyíýcsz]t
SFX T   t           no         [^aiouyíýcsz]t
SFX T   t           ni         [^aiouyíýcsz]t
SFX T   t           ny         [^aiouyíýcsz]t
SFX T   t           nu         [^aiouyíýcsz]t
SFX T   éct         ečen       éc[it]
SFX T   éct         ečena      éc[it]
SFX T   éct         ečeno      éc[it]
SFX T   éct         ečeni      éc[it]
SFX T   éct         ečeny      éc[it]
SFX T   éct         ečenu      éc[it]
SFX T   ouct        učen       ouc[it]
SFX T   ouct        učena      ouc[it]
SFX T   ouct        učeno      ouc[it]
SFX T   ouct        učeni      ouc[it]
SFX T   ouct        učeny      ouc[it]
SFX T   ouct        učenu      ouc[it]
SFX T   ást         aden       ást
SFX T   ást         adena      ást
SFX T   ást         adeno      ást
SFX T   ást         adeni      ást
SFX T   ást         adeny      ást
SFX T   ást         adenu      ást
SFX T   ést         eten       [^n]ést
SFX T   ést         etena      [^n]ést
SFX T   ést         eteno      [^n]ést
SFX T   ést         eteni      [^n]ést
SFX T   ést         eteny      [^n]ést
SFX T   ést         etenu      [^n]ést
SFX T   ést         esen       nést
SFX T   ést         esena      nést
SFX T   ést         eseno      nést
SFX T   ést         eseni      nést
SFX T   ést         eseny      nést
SFX T   ést         esenu      nést
SFX T   íst         ten        číst
SFX T   íst         tena       číst
SFX T   íst         teno       číst
SFX T   íst         teni       číst
SFX T   íst         teny       číst
SFX T   íst         tenu       číst
SFX T   íst         ěden       [dtn]íst
SFX T   íst         ědena      [dtn]íst
SFX T   íst         ědeno      [dtn]íst
SFX T   íst         ědeni      [dtn]íst
SFX T   íst         ědeny      [dtn]íst
SFX T   íst         ědenu      [dtn]íst
SFX T   íst         eden       [^čdtn]íst
SFX T   íst         edena      [^čdtn]íst
SFX T   íst         edeno      [^čdtn]íst
SFX T   íst         edeni      [^čdtn]íst
SFX T   íst         edeny      [^čdtn]íst
SFX T   íst         edenu      [^čdtn]íst
SFX T   ézt         ezen       ézt
SFX T   ézt         ezena      ézt
SFX T   ézt         ezeno      ézt
SFX T   ézt         ezeni      ézt
SFX T   ézt         ezeny      ézt
SFX T   ézt         ezenu      ézt
SFX T   it          en         [^dnt]it
SFX T   it          ena        [^dnt]it
SFX T   it          eno        [^dnt]it
SFX T   it          eni        [^dnt]it
SFX T   it          eny        [^dnt]it
SFX T   it          enu        [^dnt]it
SFX T   it          ěn         [dnt]it
SFX T   it          ěna        [dnt]it
SFX T   it          ěno        [dnt]it
SFX T   it          ěni        [dnt]it
SFX T   it          ěny        [dnt]it
SFX T   it          ěnu        [dnt]it
SFX T   at          án         at
SFX T   at          ána        at
SFX T   at          áno        at
SFX T   at          áni        at
SFX T   at          ány        at
SFX T   at          ánu        at
SFX T   ít          ěn         [dfmnptvw]ít
SFX T   ít          ěna        [dfmnptvw]ít
SFX T   ít          ěno        [dfmnptvw]ít
SFX T   ít          ěni        [dfmnptvw]ít
SFX T   ít          ěny        [dfmnptvw]ít
SFX T   ít          ěnu        [dfmnptvw]ít
SFX T   ít          en         [^dfmnptvwčšž]ít
SFX T   ít          ena        [^dfmnptvwčšž]ít
SFX T   ít          eno        [^dfmnptvwčšž]ít
SFX T   ít          eni        [^dfmnptvwčšž]ít
SFX T   ít          eny        [^dfmnptvwčšž]ít
SFX T   ít          enu        [^dfmnptvwčšž]ít
SFX T   ít          it         [šž]ít
SFX T   ít          ita        [šž]ít
SFX T   ít          ito        [šž]ít
SFX T   ít          iti        [šž]ít
SFX T   ít          ity        [šž]ít
SFX T   ít          itu        [šž]ít
SFX T   ít          at         čít
SFX T   ít          ata        čít
SFX T   ít          ato        čít
SFX T   ít          ati        čít
SFX T   ít          aty        čít
SFX T   ít          atu        čít
SFX T   out         ut         out
SFX T   out         uta        out
SFX T   out         uto        out
SFX T   out         uti        out
SFX T   out         uty        out
SFX T   out         utu        out
SFX T   ýt          yt         ýt
SFX T   ýt          yta        ýt
SFX T   ýt          yto        ýt
SFX T   ýt          yti        ýt
SFX T   ýt          yty        ýt
SFX T   ýt          ytu        ýt
